testdata/test.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>

<dictionary>

<alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
 

<sdefs>
    <sdef n="aa"/>

    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="ppres"/>
    <sdef n="ND"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
</sdefs>

<pardefs>
<pardef n="/avoir__vbhaver">

   <!-- comment -->            
                        <e><p><l>a</l><r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<!--
                        <e><f n="pref" v="bi"><p><l>a</l><r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
-->
             </pardef>


</pardefs>    


<section id="final" type="inconditional">

                        <e><par n="/avoir__vbhaver"/></e>
<!--
                        <e><f><s n="sg"/></f></e>
-->
                        <e><p><l><s n="sg"/></l><r><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><i><s n="sg"/></i></e>

 </section>
</dictionary>
